District of Columbia statutes.
29-801.06

Governing law.

The law of the District shall govern:

(1)

The internal affairs of a limited liability company; and

(2)

The liability of a member as member and a manager as manager for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited liability company.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-801.07.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 106 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).